Yamls-norm/V-taka_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - taka: # Verb pg 275 'eng put, place, pt plantar' - partial paradigm
# Perfect aspect
     taka+V+ScSg1: nytaka # I run
     taka+V+ScSg2: pytaka # you(sg) run
     taka+V+ScSg3+Msc: ytaka # he runs
     taka+V+ScSg3+Fem: utaka # she runs
     taka+V+ScPl1: ataka # we run
     taka+V+ScPl2: hỹtaka # you(pl) run
     taka+V+ScPl3+Mal: ytakana # they run
     taka+V+ScPl3+Fem: utakana # they run

     taka+V+ScSg1+Oc3M: nytakary # I put it(Mal)
     taka+V+ScSg1+Oc3F: nytakaru # I put it(Fem)
     taka+V+ScSg1+OcSg2: nytakai # I put you
     taka+V+ScSg1+OcPl2: nytakai # I put you


     taka+V+ScPl1+Oc3M: atakary # we put it
     taka+V+ScPl1+Oc3F: atakaru # we put it
     taka+V+ScPl1+OcSg2: atakai # we put you
     taka+V+ScPl1+OcPl2: atakai # we put you

     taka+V+ScSg2+Oc3M: pytakary # you(Sg) put it(Mal)
     taka+V+ScSg2+Oc3F: pytakaru # you(Sg) put it(Fem)
     taka+V+ScSg2+OcSg1: pytakano # you(Sg) put me
     taka+V+ScSg2+OcPl1: pytakawa # you(Sg) put us

     taka+V+ScPl2+Oc3M: hỹtakary # you put it
     taka+V+ScPl2+Oc3F: hỹtakaru # you put it
     taka+V+ScPl2+OcSg1: hỹtakano # you put me
     taka+V+ScPl2+OcPl1: hỹtakawa # you put us

     taka+V+ScSg3M+Oc3M: ytakary # he(Sg) put it(Mal)
     taka+V+ScSg3M+Oc3F: ytakaru # he(Sg) put it(Mal)
     taka+V+ScSg3F+Oc3M: utakary # she(Sg) put it(Fem)
     taka+V+ScSg3F+Oc3F: utakaru # she(Sg) put it(Fem)
     taka+V+ScSg3M+OcSg1: ytakano # he(Sg) put me
     taka+V+ScSg3M+OcPl1: ytakawa # he(Sg) put us
     taka+V+ScSg3F+OcSg1: utakano # she(Sg) put me
     taka+V+ScSg3F+OcPl1: utakawa # she(Sg) put us
     taka+V+ScSg3M+OcSg2: ytakai # he(Sg) put you(sg)
     taka+V+ScSg3M+OcPl2: ytakai # he(Sg) put you(pl)
     taka+V+ScSg3F+OcSg2: utakai # she(Sg) put you(sg)
     taka+V+ScSg3F+OcPl2: utakai # she(Sg) put you(pl)


     taka+V+ScPl3+Oc3M: ytakary # they put him
     taka+V+ScPl3+Oc3F: ytakaru # they put her
     taka+V+ScPl3+OcSg1: ytakano # they put me
     taka+V+ScPl3+OcPl1: ytakawa # they put us
     taka+V+ScPl3+OcSg2: ytakai # they put you(sg)
     taka+V+ScPl3+OcPl2: ytakai # they put you(pl)
